Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2783
Income tax; additional tax; notice; no appeal or protest; when.

In the event that the amount of tax is understated on the taxpayer's return as a result of a mathematical or clerical error, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the taxpayer that an amount of tax in excess of that shown on the return is due and has been assessed and the reasons therefor. Such a notice of additional tax due shall not be considered a notice of deficiency assessment nor shall the taxpayer have any right of protest or appeal as in the case of a deficiency assessment based on such notice, and the assessment and collection of the amount of tax erroneously omitted in the return is not prohibited. For purposes of this section, mathematical or clerical error includes information on the taxpayer's return that is different from information reported to the Internal Revenue Service or the Tax Commissioner, including, but not limited to, information reported on Form W-2 and Form 1099.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 83, p. 1606;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 17.